Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1804
Commission; powers; act, how construed.

(1) The commission shall have full power, authority, and jurisdiction to regulate natural gas public utilities and may do all things necessary and convenient for the exercise of such power, authority, and jurisdiction. Except as provided in the Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, such power, authority, and jurisdiction shall extend to, but not be limited to, all matters encompassed within the State Natural Gas Regulation Act.

(2) The State Natural Gas Regulation Act and all grants of power, authority, and jurisdiction in the act made to the commission shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry into effect the provisions of the act are expressly granted to and conferred upon the commission.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 3.

Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969, see section 81-552.